Hawaii statutes.
[PART
VI.] LEGISLATIVE DETERMINATION AND LEGISLATIVE

CERTIFICATION
AS TO BONDS ISSUED FOR ASSESSABLE

IMPROVEMENTS

§39-111 Legislative determination. The
provisions of this section shall be applicable to all computations and
determinations required in the declaration of findings required of the
legislature for the purposes of section 13 of Article VII of the Constitution.

In determining whether an authorization of
bonds when issued would cause to be exceeded the limitations on the total
outstanding indebtedness of the State set forth in section 13 of Article VII of
the Constitution, or whether such bonds may be excluded from such total
outstanding indebtedness under clause 3, 4, 5, 8, or 9 of that section, the
"time of issuance" thereof shall be deemed to be the same fiscal year
in which the bonds are dated even though the date of delivery of the bonds may
occur or be in the next succeeding fiscal year by reason of the definition of
"fiscal year" set forth in section 39-91. [L 1979, c 57, pt of §12]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next